Utah statutes.
17-22-26.   Sheriff -- Process on behalf of state -- Fees.
(1)  The sheriff shall without fee serve and return all process in criminal
cases to which the state is a party, that are lawfully issued by any court of
the state, except as otherwise provided by law.
(2)  If the process issues from a court outside of his county, he is entitled
to his actual expenses necessarily incurred.  The expenses shall be paid by
the county where the process was issued.
